Washington statutes.
RCW 26.44.280

Liability limited.

Consistent with the paramount concern of the department to protect the child's interests of basic nurture, physical and mental health, and safety, and the requirement that the child's health and safety interests prevail over conflicting legal interests of a parent, custodian, or guardian, the liability of governmental entities, and their officers, agents, employees, and volunteers, to parents, custodians, or guardians accused of abuse or neglect is limited as provided in RCW 4.24.595.

[ 2012 c 259 s 14.]